California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Except as otherwise provided in this article, and except as modified by the express terms of the funding or refunding bonds or the proceedings authorizing their issuance, all the provisions of this chapter apply to such funding or refunding bonds and to the issuance and sale or exchange thereof, and the holders thereof shall be subrogated to all the rights and powers of the holders of the bonds funded or refunded thereby or surrendered in exchange therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31165.

Any funding or refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for:

(a) The payment of the bonds to be funded or refunded thereby.

(b) All expenses incidental to the calling, retiring, or payment of the outstanding bonds and the issuance of the funding or refunding bonds, including the difference in amount between the par value of the funding or refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which they may be sold.

(c) Any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon the funding or refunding bonds from the date of their sale to the date of maturity or payment of the bonds to be funded or refunded out of the proceeds of the sale, or the date upon which the bonds to be funded or refunded will be paid pursuant to the call thereof or agreement with the holders thereof.

(d) The premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31166.

All bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are negotiable instruments under the law merchant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31167.

All bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the income therefrom are at all times exempt from taxation, except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31168.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute or be a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or El Dorado County. The payment of both principal and interest of all bonds shall be secured only by the tolls or other revenues collected from the toll tunnel, other revenues and interest thereon, and sinking funds created therefrom received by the authority, and shall be paid from such tolls or revenues or from such other contributions or appropriations as may be made available pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31169.

The bond redemption and interest payments constitute a first direct and exclusive charge and lien on all tolls and other revenues, and interest thereon, and sinking funds created therefrom received from the use and operation of the toll tunnel. Such tolls and revenues together with the interest earned thereon constitute a trust fund for the security and payment of the bonds and shall not be used or pledged for any other purpose as long as any such bonds are outstanding and unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31170.

While any bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31171.

The holder of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon the authority or its officers, agents, and employees in connection with the construction, maintenance, operation, and insurance of the toll tunnel, in connection with the collection, deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of all tolls and other revenues derived from the operation and use of the toll tunnel, and in connection with the deposit, investment, and disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of bonds. The enumeration of rights and remedies in this chapter does not exclude the exercise or prosecution of any other rights or remedies by the holders of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31172.

The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may investigate and ascertain the status or sufficiency as investments for savings banks in this state of any such bonds. If upon investigation it is determined in his or her opinion that such bonds constitute a proper investment for savings banks, he or she shall so certify. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may revoke any such certificate issued by him or her at any time in his or her discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 811.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 814 of Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------

31173.

All bonds issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter, and which have been first certified by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, are legal investments for all trust funds, for the funds of all insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies, and for state school funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 812.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 814 of Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------

31174.

Any money or funds which may by law be invested in bonds of the state, cities, counties, or school districts in the state may be invested in the bonds issued by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31175.

Whenever any bonds of the state, or of any city, county, or school district in the state, may by law be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money the bonds issued by the authority may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Custody and Use of Money [31180. - 31189.]

31180.

The proceeds from the sale of all bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the treasurer for the credit of the authority and forthwith deposited as demand deposits in such depositary or depositaries as are authorized by law to receive deposits of state funds, to the credit of a fund to be designated as the acquisition and construction fund of the toll tunnel. The fund shall at all times be kept segregated and set apart from all other funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31181.

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be paid out or disbursed solely for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel, the acquisition of the necessary lands and easements therefor, and the payment of interest on the bonds during the period of actual construction and for a period of six months thereafter, only as the need therefor arises. The authority may agree with the purchaser of the bonds upon any conditions or limitations restricting the disbursement of such funds which are deemed advisable for the purposes of assuring the proper application of the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31182.

All money in the acquisition and construction fund not required to meet current acquisition or construction costs of the toll tunnel, and all funds constituting surplus revenues which are not immediately needed for the particular object or purpose to which they are required to be applied or to which they are pledged, shall be invested in bonds and obligations eligible for investment of surplus state money. The authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds that the investment of such money shall be made only in particular bonds and obligations within the classifications eligible for such investment, and such provisions shall be binding upon the authority and all officials having anything to do with the investment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31183.

Any surplus which exists in the acquisition and construction fund shall be applied to the retirement, by purchase or call, of bonds issued for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel. If such bonds cannot be purchased at a price satisfactory to the authority and are not by their terms callable prior to maturity, the surplus shall be paid into the fund applicable to the payment of principal and interest of such bonds and shall be used for that purpose. The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may provide limitations and conditions upon the time and manner of applying the surplus to the purchase and call of outstanding bonds and the terms upon which they shall be purchased or called, and such limitations and conditions shall be followed and observed in the application and use of the surplus. All bonds retired by purchase or call shall be immediately canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31184.

All tolls or other revenues received from the operation of the toll tunnel shall be paid over by the department at least monthly to the treasurer who shall deposit them forthwith in such depositary or depositaries as are authorized by law to receive deposits of state funds, to the credit of a special fund to be designated as the toll revenue fund of the toll tunnel, which fund shall at all times be kept segregated and set apart from all other funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31185.

From the money deposited in the acquisition and construction fund, the treasurer shall transfer to the place or places of payment named in the bonds such sums as are required to pay the interest as it becomes due on all bonds sold and outstanding for the construction of the toll tunnel during the period of actual construction and during the period of six months immediately thereafter. The treasurer shall thereafter transfer from the toll revenue fund to the place or places of payment named in the bonds such sums as are required to pay the interest on the bonds and to redeem the principal thereof as such interest payments and bond redemptions fall due for all bonds issued and sold for the construction or acquisition of the toll tunnel. All funds transferred for the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued for the toll tunnel shall be segregated and applied solely for the payment of such principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31186.

The money remaining in the toll revenue fund, after providing the amount required for interest and redemption of bonds, shall be held and applied as provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds. If the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds do not require surplus revenues to be held or applied in any particular manner, they shall be allocated and used for such other purposes incidental to the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of the toll tunnel as the authority determines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31187.

Money required to meet the costs of acquisition or construction and all expenses and costs incidental to the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel, or to meet the costs of operating, maintaining, and repairing it, shall be paid from the proper fund therefor upon demand of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31188.

All interest received or earned on money deposited in each and every fund provided for in this article shall be credited to and become a part of the particular fund upon which the interest accrues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31189.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter, the proceeds received from the sale of bonds and the tolls or other revenues received from the operation of the toll tunnel may be used to defray any expenses incurred by the authority in connection with and incidental to the issuance and sale of bonds for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel, including expenses for the preparation of surveys and estimates and the making of inspections and examinations as may be required by the purchasers of the bonds, except that the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds may contain appropriate provisions governing the use and application of the bond proceeds and toll or other revenues for the purposes specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Acquisition and Disposition of Property [31200. - 31210.]

31200.

The authority may acquire by gift, purchase, or eminent domain proceedings any franchise, rights, privileges, easements, or other property, either real or personal, necessary therefor, when the construction of the toll tunnel is authorized by the authority. This article shall not apply to any portion of the state highway system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31201.

In eminent domain proceedings to acquire property for any of the purposes of this chapter, any real property, personal property, franchises, rights, easements, or other property or privileges appurtenant thereto appropriated or dedicated to a public use or purpose by any person, private, public, or municipal corporation, county, city, district, or any political subdivision of the state, may be condemned and taken, and the acquisition and use thereof as provided in this chapter for the same public use or purpose to which such property has been appropriated or dedicated or for any other public use or purpose, shall be deemed a superior and permanent right and necessity, and a more necessary use and purpose than the public use or purpose to which such property has already been appropriated or dedicated.

It shall not be necessary in any eminent domain proceedings pursuant to this section to plead or prove any acts or proceedings preliminary or prior to the adoption of the resolution required by Section 1245.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

31205.

The right-of-way is given, dedicated, and set apart upon which to locate, construct, and maintain the toll tunnel through, over, under, on, or across any property of the state now or hereafter owned, opened, or dedicated to or for public use and howsoever acquired, and through, over, under, on, or across the streets, alleys, lanes, and roads now or hereafter opened or dedicated to or for public use and howsoever acquired which are now or may be within any county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31206.

If any property belonging to any county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision of the state, is taken for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel, or if any such property is injured or damaged by such acquisition or construction, and the payment of compensation therefor is necessary, proper and necessary compensation therefor as is agreed upon may be paid by the authority to the particular county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision of the state owning or in charge of such property, or the authority may direct that eminent domain proceedings be brought pursuant to this article for the determination of such compensation, including the determination of the interest of any such county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision in such property and the necessity for the payment of such compensation.

Whenever the authority requires a public utility to remove and relocate any utility facility, the authority shall reimburse the owner of the public utility facility for the expense of the removal and relocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31207.

In all cases where, by statute or otherwise, any right is reserved or granted to the state or any state agency to construct or maintain highways, bridges, or approaches thereto, or other highway crossings, over, through, under, on, or across any public or private property, the authority is entitled to the benefit of such reservation or grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31208.

Whenever any property acquired for any of the purposes of this chapter, whether by agreement, grant, or eminent domain, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, is no longer necessary for use in connection with any improvement authorized to be constructed pursuant to this chapter, or whenever a lesser interest than is owned therein is sufficient for the construction, maintenance, and operation of any improvement, or whenever it is for any other reason in the public interest so to do, the property, any part thereof, or any interest therein may be leased, sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of or dealt with by the authority in the manner, upon such terms, and subject to such reservations as it deems necessary or desirable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31209.

Whenever, either before or after the construction or reconstruction of streets, sidewalks, or other like facilities upon any property or interest in property acquired pursuant to this chapter, it appears desirable to dedicate the property to public use for such purpose, the authority may dedicate or transfer the property to any county, city, or other public or municipal corporation within which it is located, subject, however, to any rights or interests necessary for the proper construction, maintenance, and operation of the toll tunnel which extends through, over, under, on, or across the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31210.

Any money received for any such property shall be received into the funds for the toll tunnel for which the property was originally acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Insurance of Property [31220. - 31223.]

31220.

When the toll tunnel is being built by the authority, it may carry or cause to be carried such an amount of insurance or indemnity bond as protection against loss or damage as it deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31221.

The authority may carry insurance in such amount as it deems proper to cover any accident or destruction in part or in whole to the toll tunnel until all bonds sold for the acquisition or construction of such toll tunnel and interest accrued thereon have been fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31222.

All money collected on any indemnity bond or insurance policy as the result of any damage or injury to the toll tunnel shall be used for the purpose of repairing or rebuilding the toll tunnel, as long as there are revenue bonds against such structure outstanding and unredeemed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31223.

The authority may also carry insurance or indemnity bonds insuring against the loss of tolls or other revenues to be derived from the toll tunnel by reason of any interruption in the use of the toll tunnel from any cause whatever. The proceeds of the insurance or indemnity bonds shall be paid into the fund into which the tolls and other revenues of the toll tunnel so insured are required to be paid and shall be applied to the same purposes and in the same manner as other money in the fund. The insurance or indemnity bonds may be in an amount equal to the probable tolls and other revenues to be received from the operation of the toll tunnel during any period of time determined by the authority and fixed in its discretion, and may be paid for out of the toll revenue fund as specified in the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Local Cooperation [31230. - 31235.]

31230.

Any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state upon the request of the authority may advance or contribute money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and other property toward the expense of building, acquiring, and maintaining the toll tunnel, and for preliminary surveys and the preparation of plans and estimates of cost thereof and other preliminary expenses. Appropriations for such purposes may be made from any funds available, including highway funds received from the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31231.

Any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state may issue general obligation bonds for any of the purposes enumerated in this article. All proceedings for the authorization, issue, and sale of such bonds shall be had under the law governing the issue and sale of bonds for public improvements by the particular political subdivision or public corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31232.

Money or property advanced or contributed pursuant to this article may be immediately transferred or delivered to the authority to be used for the purpose for which such advance or contribution was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31233.

The authority may enter into a binding agreement with any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state to repay any money or the value of any rights-of-way, labor, materials, or other property advanced or contributed toward the expense of acquiring or constructing the toll tunnel, but no repayment therefor shall be made until all obligations issued by the authority for the construction of such toll tunnel have been fully redeemed and paid, and then only out of the tolls and revenues received from the operation of the toll tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31234.

The collection of tolls shall be continued on the toll tunnel until all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter for its construction are fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31235.

After all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter for the construction of the toll tunnel have been fully redeemed and paid, the authority may continue to collect tolls and other revenues for the use of such toll tunnel for the purpose of reimbursing the state for any expenditures which have been made by it in connection with the toll tunnel and for the purpose of repayment to any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state of any amount the authority has agreed to repay for money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, or other property advanced or contributed for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. State Cooperation [31240. - 31240.]

31240.

The California Highway Commission and the Department of Public Works shall, upon the request of the authority, aid in the construction of any necessary connections with U.S. Highway 50.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Operation and Maintenance After Retirement of Bonds [31245. - 31246.]

31245.

After all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter for the construction of the toll tunnel have been fully redeemed and paid, the authority shall either:

(a) Transfer the toll tunnel to the state for operation and maintenance as a state highway by the department, either free of tolls or at the rates of tolls adjusted so as to provide a fund of not to exceed the amount necessary for the proper maintenance, repair, and operation of the toll tunnel under economical management; or

(b) Operate and maintain the toll tunnel itself, either free of tolls or at rates of toll adjusted so as to provide a fund of not to exceed the amount necessary for the proper maintenance, repair, and operation of the toll tunnel under economical management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31246.

If the toll tunnel is transferred to the state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31245, the existence of the authority shall thereupon automatically terminate, and all property, funds, and records relating to the toll tunnel shall be transferred to the state and thereafter the state shall be responsible for the maintenance, repair, and operation of the toll tunnel, and for the fulfillment of any outstanding contracts executed by the authority and the payment of any outstanding debts or liabilities incurred by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Border Region Toll Facilities [31300. - 31306.]

31300.

(a) Tolls may be imposed by the commission on segments of newly constructed state highway routes, as described in subdivision (b), if transportation facilities, including, but not limited to, additional highways and capacity enhancing improvements to existing highways, are needed to accommodate additional commercial traffic resulting from the North American Free Trade Agreement, and federal funds have not been made available to the state for those purposes. In addition, for state highway routes and transportation facilities constructed on or after January 1, 1997, the cost may be borne by a combination of tolls, toll-backed bonds, and any other state and federal funds that may be available for those purposes, on a project-by-project basis.

(b) The imposition of tolls pursuant to subdivision (a) is limited to Route 7, from the new international border crossing near Calexico to Route 8 near El Centro in Imperial County.

(c) Tolls imposed on any route described in this section shall be discontinued upon the happening of either of the following: (1) federal funds are received for the cost of the improvements to that route, which funds are in addition to the normal apportionment of federal funds to California and are for the specific purpose of mitigating the impacts of the North American Free Trade Agreement, or (2) the cost of those improvements is fully paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31302.

The department shall be responsible for the collection of tolls imposed by the commission pursuant to Section 31300. The department shall transmit the toll revenues to the Controller for deposit in the Highway Toll Revenue Account, which is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31304.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds in the Highway Toll Revenue Account required to meet the obligations assumed by the commission under any bond resolution adopted pursuant to Section 31306 are continuously appropriated to the commission for that purpose. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the commission shall allocate the remaining funds to the department for the purpose of constructing additional highways or making capacity enhancing improvements to existing highways to accommodate additional commercial traffic resulting from the North American Free Trade Agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31306.

The commission may issue revenue bonds for the purpose of obtaining funds for constructing additional highways or for making capacity enhancing improvements to existing highways to accommodate additional commercial traffic resulting from the North American Free Trade Agreement. The sole security for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds shall be revenues derived from the tolls imposed pursuant to Section 31300. In authorizing and issuing bonds pursuant to this chapter, the commission and the department shall, to the fullest extent feasible, follow the procedures and requirements of Article 5 (commencing with Section 30200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Otay Mesa East Toll Facility Act [31460. - 31483.]

31460.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is essential for the economic well-being of, and the maintenance of a high quality of life in, San Diego County and the State of California that the people of the State of California receive the full benefits of international trade with Mexico.

(b) Trade is a critical component of the San Diego regional economy. Mexico is the United States’ third largest trading partner, after Canada and China, and California’s number one export market.

(c) Trade passing through San Diego County’s portion of the
 United States-Mexico border region benefits every state in the union and contributes over $11 billion to the California GDP, and $26 billion to the United States GDP.

(d) Commercial and passenger traffic between the United States and Mexico using California’s ports of entry is placing extreme demands on the state’s border transportation assets which were not designed for these purposes.

(e) Congestion at the border causes increased wait times, which in turn increases commercial and noncommercial vehicle emissions.

(f) Inadequate infrastructure capacity at the existing border crossings between San Diego County and Baja California currently creates traffic congestion and delays for crossborder personal trips and
 freight movements that cost the United States and Mexican economies an estimated $3.4 billion in foregone gross output and more than 88,000 jobs in 2016.

(g) Public revenues to provide for an efficient border region transportation system have not kept pace with the growth of traffic and goods crossing the international border with Mexico.

(h) The state must seek all reasonable alternatives to address unmet border transportation needs and to improve existing transportation facilities.

(i) Public toll transportation facilities should be encouraged to supplement limited public resources and to support the development of new transportation system capacity.

(j) The port of entry serves, among other things, as a related fixed facility to the public system of streets and roads that
 facilitates the movement of goods, people, and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31461.

This chapter may be cited as the Otay Mesa East Toll Facility Act. All references to the “act” in this chapter shall mean the Otay Mesa East Toll Facility Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31462.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that relate to price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance. A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and meeting the objectives of the project, selection of the best proposal for a stipulated sum established by the procuring agency, or a tradeoff between price and other specified factors.

(b) “Board” means the board of directors of SANDAG.

(c) “Bonds” means any bonds, notes, variable rate and variable maturity securities, and any other evidence of indebtedness issued pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” or “CMGC” means a project delivery method using a best value procurement process in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.

(e) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services as needed pursuant to
 a CMGC contract.

(f) “Corridor” means State Route 11 in the County of San Diego, as defined in Section 311.

(g) “Costs” includes the cost of construction or acquisition; the cost of the acquisition of all land, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by SANDAG for the construction; the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which buildings or structures may be moved; the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest before and during construction and, if considered advisable by SANDAG, costs of accounting, consulting, printing,
 advertising, and travel, cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing, repairing, or improving a project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the construction, repair, or improvement of a project, the financing of the project, the placing and maintaining of a project in operation, and any payments to an entity to cover all or a portion of the costs described in this chapter. Any money paid or advanced to SANDAG with its approval for traffic surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications, and other engineering services in connection with the construction, repair, or improvement of a project shall be regarded as a part
 of the cost of a project and may be reimbursed out of the proceeds of the revenue bonds issued for a project as authorized in this chapter. Cost includes the cost to operate, maintain, repair, or improve a project.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(i) “Design-build” means a procurement process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured in a single phase.

(j) “Design sequencing” means a procurement process that enables the sequencing of design activities to permit each construction phase to commence when design for that phase is complete, instead of requiring the design for the entire project to be completed before commencing construction.

(k) “Entity” means the United States or any agency or department of the United States, any State of California agency, department or political subdivision of the state, or any public or private corporation, company, partnership, joint venture, foundation, trust, estate, individual, or other legal business organization.

(l) “Federal agency” means any agency or department of the United States.

(m) “Project” or “projects” means any property and related facilities, whether or not now in existence, acquired or constructed to facilitate the movement of goods and people along the corridor or at the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry, including property suitable for any of the following purposes:

(1) International ports of entry.

(2) International border crossing facilities.

(3) Transportation facilities, including highway and roadway, public transit, and nonmotorized facilities, and other projects supporting any transportation facility.

(4) A bridge or tunnel, overpasses, underpasses, entrance plazas, toll houses, administration, storage and other buildings and facilities, and all equipment therefor, and may include terminal facilities, customs and immigration facilities, and such approaches and approach highways as may be determined by SANDAG to be necessary to facilitate the flow of traffic or to connect a project with the existing highway systems,
 together with all property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by SANDAG for the construction or operation of a project, including, but not limited to, energy and communication lines.

(n) “Property” means land, improvements to land, buildings, improvements to buildings, machinery and equipment of any kind, operating capital, and any other real or personal property necessary for a project.

(o) “SANDAG” means the San Diego Association of Governments, as referenced in the San Diego Regional Transportation Consolidation Act, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7 of the Public Utilities Code.

(p) “Toll” means a toll, fee, or other charge for entrance to or use of the corridor and such toll,
 fee, or other charge as may be governed by an agreement under Section 31483.

(q) “Trustee” means any financial institution or trust company actually doing business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 163, Sec. 1.   (AB 427)   Effective September 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31463.

This act, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31465.

This chapter shall provide an additional and alternative method for doing the things authorized by this chapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to any powers and rights conferred on SANDAG by other laws. When carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter, SANDAG shall comply with the requirements imposed by the San Diego Regional Transportation Consolidation Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7 of the Public Utilities Code) not in conflict with this chapter, including, but not limited to, noticing, holding, and conducting its meetings in accordance with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31466.

SANDAG shall have and may exercise all rights and powers, expressed or implied, that are necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter, including the power to do all of the following:

(a) Issue bonds payable from and secured by a pledge of SANDAG of all or any part of the revenues of SANDAG to finance the activities authorized by this act and for the purpose of financing the cost of acquiring or operating any project or to purchase, refund, or otherwise acquire, at or before maturity, any outstanding bonds meeting the requirements provided in this chapter, and to sell those bonds at public or private sale in the form and on the terms and conditions
 as SANDAG shall approve.

(b) Consult with counties, cities, towns, and other agencies and political subdivisions of this state and Mexico relating to plans and projects authorized by this chapter.
